inc/eng-verb-phrase-inflector.xfscript
! Indirect Object Conversion
regex [ IOBJ -> {me} "@R.recipient.1Sg@"
, IOBJ -> {you} "@R.recipient.2Sg@"
, IOBJ -> {him/her} "@R.recipient.3Sg@"
, IOBJ -> {us both} "@R.recipient.1Du@"
, IOBJ -> {you both} "@R.recipient.2Du@"
, IOBJ -> {them both} "@R.recipient.3Du@"
, IOBJ -> {us} "@R.recipient.1Pl@"
, IOBJ -> {you and us} "@R.recipient.21Pl@"
, IOBJ -> {you all} "@R.recipient.2Pl@"
, IOBJ -> {them} "@R.recipient.3Pl@"
, IOBJ -> {him/her/them} "@R.recipient.4Sg/Pl@"
, IOBJ -> {him/her/them over there} "@R.recipient.5Sg/Pl@"
, IOBJ -> {someone} "@R.recipient.X@"
, IOBJ -> {some people} "@R.recipient.XPl@"
, IOBJ -> {someone} "@D.recipient@"
|| Wx [ {to } | {for } ] _ ] ;
define IObjectConversion

! Subject Inverse Conversion
regex [ SUBJ -> {me} "@R.subject.1Sg@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, SUBJ -> {you} "@R.subject.2Sg@" "@R.tense.Inf@"
, SUBJ -> {(you)} "@R.subject.2Sg@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" ]  
, SUBJ -> {him/her} "@R.subject.3Sg@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, {it} -> {it} "@R.subject.3Sg@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, SUBJ -> {us} "@R.subject.1Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, SUBJ -> {us both} "@R.subject.1Du@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, SUBJ -> {each and every one of us} "@R.subject.1Distr@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, SUBJ -> {you and us} "@R.subject.21Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, SUBJ -> {you both} "@R.subject.2Du@" "@R.tense.Inf@"
, SUBJ -> {each and every one of you} "@R.subject.2Distr@" "@R.tense.Inf@"
, SUBJ -> {you all} "@R.subject.2Pl@" "@R.tense.Inf@"
, SUBJ -> {(you both)} "@R.subject.2Du@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" ]  
, SUBJ -> {(you all)} "@R.subject.2Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" ]  
, SUBJ | {it} -> {them} "@R.subject.3Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, SUBJ | {it} -> {them both} "@R.subject.3Du@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, SUBJ | {it} -> {each and every one of them} "@R.subject.3Distr@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, {it} -> {it over there} "@R.subject.4Sg@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, {it} -> {them over there} "@R.subject.4Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, SUBJ -> {him/her/them} "@R.subject.4Sg/Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, SUBJ -> {him/her/them over there} "@R.subject.5Sg/Pl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]  
, SUBJ -> {someone} "@R.subject.X@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]
, SUBJ -> {people} "@R.subject.XPl@" [ "@R.tense.Imm@" | "@R.tense.Del@" | "@R.tense.Inf@" ]
|| Wx _ Wx ]

! Subject Conversion
| [ SUBJ -> {I} "@R.subject.1Sg@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ  -> {you} "@R.subject.2Sg@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ -> {he/she} "@R.subject.3Sg@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, {it} -> {it} "@R.subject.3Sg@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ  -> {we} "@R.subject.1Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ  -> {we both} "@R.subject.1Du@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ  -> {each and every one of us} "@R.subject.1Distr@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ -> {we and you} "@R.subject.21Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ  -> {you both} "@R.subject.2Du@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ  -> {each and every one of you} "@R.subject.2Distr@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ -> {you all} "@R.subject.2Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ | {it} -> {they} "@R.subject.3Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ | {it} -> {they both} "@R.subject.3Du@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ | {it} -> {each and every one of them} "@R.subject.3Distr@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ | {it} -> {it over there} "@R.subject.4Sg@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ | {it} -> {they over there} "@R.subject.4Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ | {it} -> {s/he/they} "@R.subject.4Sg/Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ -> {s/he/they over there} "@R.subject.5Sg/Pl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@" 
, SUBJ -> {someone} "@R.subject.X@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@"
, SUBJ -> {people} "@R.subject.XPl@" "@D.tense.Imm@" "@D.tense.Del@" "@D.tense.Inf@"
|| Wx _ Wx ] ;
define SubjectConversion

! Object Conversion
regex [ DOBJ -> {me} "@R.object.1Sg@"
, DOBJ -> {you} "@R.object.2Sg@"
, DOBJ -> {him/her} "@R.object.3Sg@"
, DOBJ  -> {us} "@R.object.1Pl@"
, DOBJ  -> {us both} "@R.object.1Du@"
, DOBJ  -> {each and every one of us} "@R.object.1Distr@"
, DOBJ -> {you and us} "@R.object.21Pl@"
, DOBJ -> {you both} "@R.object.2Du@"
, DOBJ -> {each and every one of you} "@R.object.2Distr@"
, DOBJ -> {you all} "@R.object.2Pl@"
, DOBJ  -> {them both} "@R.object.3Du@"
, DOBJ  -> {each and every one of them} "@R.object.3Distr@"
, DOBJ  -> {them} "@R.object.3Pl@"
, DOBJ  -> {him/her/them} "@R.object.4Sg/Pl@"
, DOBJ  -> {him/her/them over there} "@R.object.5Sg/Pl@"
, DOBJ -> {someone} "@R.object.X@"
, DOBJ -> {people} "@R.object.XPl@"
, DOBJ -> {someone} "@D.object@" ! Allows for generation of VTA phrase even if object feature is not specified
, DOBJinanim -> {it} "@D.object@"
|| Wx _ Wx ]
,, [ [..] -> "@D.object@" || _ .#. ] ;
define ObjectConversion

! Reflexive Conversion
regex [ RFLX -> {myself} "@R.subject.1Sg@"
, RFLX -> {yourself} "@R.subject.2Sg@"
, RFLX -> {him/herself} "@R.subject.3Sg@"
, RFLX -> {ourselves} "@R.subject.1Du@"
, RFLX -> {ourselves} "@R.subject.1Pl@"
, RFLX -> {your/ourselves} "@R.subject.21Pl@"
, RFLX -> {yourselves} "@R.subject.2Du@"
, RFLX -> {yourselves} "@R.subject.2Pl@"
, RFLX -> {themselves} "@R.subject.3Pl@"
, RFLX -> {themselves} "@R.subject.3Du@"
, RFLX -> {him/her/themselves} "@R.subject.4Sg/Pl@"
, RFLX -> {him/her/themselves} "@R.subject.5Sg/Pl@"
, RFLX -> {him/herself} "@R.subject.X@"
, RFLX -> {themselves} "@R.subject.XPl@"
|| Wx _ ] ;
define ReflexiveConversion

! Possessive Conversion
regex [ POSS -> {my} "@R.subject.1Sg@"
, POSS -> {your} "@R.subject.2Sg@"
, POSS -> {his/her} "@R.subject.3Sg@"
, POSS -> {our} "@R.subject.1Pl@"
, POSS -> {our} "@R.subject.1Du@"
, POSS -> {your and our} "@R.subject.21Pl@"
, POSS -> {your} "@R.subject.2Du@"
, POSS -> {your} "@R.subject.2Pl@"
, POSS -> {their} "@R.subject.3Du@"
, POSS -> {their} "@R.subject.3Pl@"
, POSS -> {his/her/their} "@R.subject.4Sg/Pl@"
, POSS -> {his/her/their} "@R.subject.5Sg/Pl@"
, POSS -> {someone's} "@R.subject.X@"
, POSS -> {their} "@R.subject.XPl@"
|| Wx _ Wx ] ;
define PossessiveConversion

! Conversion of tags into flag-diacritics
regex [ "Cnj+" -> "@P.clause.Cnj@" , "Rel+" -> "@P.clause.Rel@" ]
.o. [ "Prs+" -> "@P.tense.Prs@" , "Prt+" -> "@P.tense.Prt@" , "Def+" -> "@P.tense.Def@" , "Fut+" -> "@P.tense.Fut@" , "Int+" -> "@P.tense.Int@" , "Cond+" -> "@P.tense.Cond@" , "Imm+" -> "@P.tense.Imm@" , "Del+" -> "@P.tense.Del@" , "Inf+" -> "@P.tense.Inf@" ]
.o. [ "Prog+" -> "@P.prog.Prog@" ]
.o. [ "Rept+" -> "@P.rept.Rept@" ]
.o. [ "Neg+" -> "@P.neg.Neg@" ]
.o. [ "1Sg+" -> "@P.subject.1Sg@" , "2Sg+" -> "@P.subject.2Sg@", "3Sg+" -> "@P.subject.3Sg@" , "1Du+" -> "@P.subject.1Du@" , "2Du+" -> "@P.subject.2Du@" , "3Du+" -> "@P.subject.3Du@" , "1Distr+" -> "@P.subject.1Distr@" , "2Distr+" -> "@P.subject.2Distr@", "3Distr+" -> "@P.subject.3Distr@", "1Pl+" -> "@P.subject.1Pl@" , "21Pl+" -> "@P.subject.21Pl@", "2Pl+" -> "@P.subject.2Pl@" , "3Pl+" -> "@P.subject.3Pl@" , "4Sg+" -> "@P.subject.4Sg@" , "4Pl+" -> "@P.subject.4Pl@" , "4Sg/Pl+" -> "@P.subject.4Sg/Pl@" , "5Sg/Pl+" -> "@P.subject.5Sg/Pl@", "X+" -> "@P.subject.X@" , "XPl+" -> "@P.subject.XPl@" ]
.o. [ "1SgO+" -> "@P.object.1Sg@" , "2SgO+" -> "@P.object.2Sg@", "3SgO+" -> "@P.object.3Sg@" , "1DuO+" -> "@P.object.1Du@" , "2DuO+" -> "@P.object.2Du@", "3DuO+" -> "@P.object.3Du@" , "1DistrO+" -> "@P.object.1Distr@", "2DistrO+" -> "@P.object.2Distr@" , "3DistrO+" -> "@P.object.3Distr@" , "1PlO+" -> "@P.object.1Pl@" , "21PlO+" -> "@P.object.21Pl@", "2PlO+" -> "@P.object.2Pl@" , "3PlO+" -> "@P.object.3Pl@" ,  "4Sg/PlO+" -> "@P.object.4Sg/Pl@" , "5Sg/PlO+" -> "@P.object.5Sg/Pl@", "XO+" -> "@P.object.X@" , "XPlO+" -> "@P.object.XPl@" ]
.o. [ "1SgIO+" -> "@P.recipient.1Sg@" , "2SgIO+" -> "@P.recipient.2Sg@" , "3SgIO+" -> "@P.recipient.3Sg@" ,  "1DuIO+" -> "@P.recipient.1Du@" , "2DuIO+" -> "@P.recipient.2Du@" , "3DuIO+" -> "@P.recipient.3Du@" , "1PlIO+" -> "@P.recipient.1Pl@" , "21PlIO+" -> "@P.recipient.21Pl@" , "2PlIO+" -> "@P.recipient.2Pl@" , "3PlIO+" -> "@P.recipient.3Pl@" , "4Sg/PlIO+" -> "@P.recipient.4Sg/Pl@" , "5Sg/PlIO+" -> "@P.recipient.5Sg/Pl@" , "XIO+" -> "@P.recipient.X@" , "XPlIO+" -> "@P.recipient.XPl@" ] ;
define Tag2FlagConversion

! Resolving irregularities of the spelling of English (irregular and regular) verb wordforms

read lexc inc/eng-phrase-inflection/cw-eng-verbs-prs3Sg2inf.lexc
define EngInf

regex [ EngInf -> || [ Wx | Bx ] _ [ Wx | Bx ] ] ;
define EngInf2Inf

read lexc inc/eng-phrase-inflection/cw-eng-verbs-prs3Sg2prt.lexc
define EngPrt

regex [ EngPrt -> || [ Wx | Bx ] _ [ Wx | Bx ] ] ;
define EngPrt2Prt

read lexc inc/eng-phrase-inflection/cw-eng-verbs-prs3Sg2prog.lexc
define EngProg

regex [ EngProg -> || [ Wx | Bx ] _ [ Wx | Bx ] ] ;
define EngProg2Prog

source inc/eng-phrase-inflection/phonology-eng.xfscript
define EngPhon

regex [ ">" -> 0 || Alphabet+ _ Alphabet* ] ;
define RemoveSuffixBoundary

! Definition of input and conversion
regex [ (Clause) TenseAspect Subject (DirectObject) (IndirectObject) (Progressive) (Repetitive) (Negation) Letters+ ] ;
define Input

regex [ Input
.o. itNonSubjectMarking
.o. Standardization
.o. Tag2FlagConversion
.o. VerbInflection
.o. IrregularVerbs
.o. AuxiliaryPhrase
.o. BeAuxiliaryPhrase
.o. PhrasePrefix
.o. PhraseSuffix
.o. Relativization
.o. BeInflection
.o. IObjectConversion
.o. SubjectConversion
.o. ObjectConversion
.o. ReflexiveConversion
.o. PossessiveConversion
! Resolving orthographically correct forms for listed English inflected wordforms 
.o. EngInf2Inf
.o. EngPrt2Prt
.o. EngProg2Prog
! Making best guess of correct wordform for non-listed wordforms
.o. EngPhon
.o. RemoveSuffixBoundary
] ;

twosided flag-diacritics
